2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-is.pat.txt
??n4g??
??pl5i
??r5ef
??r??t4
??r5sl
??r1t
??r3un
??r5v
??3r??
2??s
??4sa
??s3ei
??s3??
??s4sti
??s4sv
??s1v
??t3e
??t2he
??ti5f
??t2is
??tj4
??t1l2
??t1r
4??1u
??1v
??4va
??5??
v2a2
va??r5
va5fo
va5h
5vallag
va4n
var4ma
varps3
var5??
var4v
v3ast
va4t
3vax
ve??5l
ve3fe
1veg
v2ei
3vei??
vein4as
5veis
4velg
2vep
v4er
1ver??
ver3gj
3verk
ver2s
v??2
v5??s
v3??t5
2v3h
v2i
2vi.
v4i??
5vi??ar
vi??3l
vil4i
vi3li??
3viln
vi4lo
vin3gj
4vip
3virk
visk5un
3viss
vis4v
5vita
vitk5
vit2n
4viv
4v??b
2v????
5v??k
3v??si
v??sl3a
v??1v
2vn
vo3k
vol4
vork4
vor4r
4vr1
4vs
2vu
v1u??
v1un
5v??g
wa4
win4s4
x5ar
x2as
x3e
x3f
x5i
xis4
x??3
x??k4
x5??u
xt5a??
x1u4
y5ba
y??2s
yf5a
yf1i
yfj5a??
yft4is
y1i
yj3ar
yj5??
yk5e
yk3i
yk3su
yk3u
yk3v
ylf5i
ylgn4
yll5a
yl4v
ym3a
ymp5??
y4n
ynj5ar
ynj3??
yn4k
yn4t
yn5u
yp2us
yr5e
yr1i
yr3il
yrir3
yrj3
yrkv3a
yr2l
yr2s
yr1u
y2s
ysj3
ys2s
yst3ug
yt4h
ytil4
yt4k
y3v
??5a
??af5
??5??
????2s
??fl4
??3flu
??g4r
??g4u??
??1i
??ja5f4
??m4a
??m4k
??pru4
??p2s
??rf4
??ri3m
??ri5p4
??r3l
??4si
??sig4
??s4l
??s4m
??3st??
??5u
??5??
??3v
??5y
z??4
??2a
??am4
??arf5a
??ar4m
4??b
??2i
??ist3i
??j??4
??ol5a
??or3f4
??or3g
??orm4
??1??l
3????r
????r5i
??2r2
??ra4
??r??s4
??ris4
??r??l4
??r??3t
??ru4
??um5a
??umb3
??ur2
????s3
??2v
??ver5sk
??1b
????n5
????nis5
????2s
????4ug
4??f
??f1a
??4fi
??f3ust
??g5ist
??1i
??j3
??j4al
??jark4
??k1a
??k1li
??k3u
??2l
??l3an
??l3e
??l3us
??m3a
??m4al
??4mundu
??nak4
??n4k
??r1a
??r3e
??rg??ng5
??rif4
??r3ist
??ri3sv
??r3l
??r4n
??r2s
??r5un
??r1us
??5r??
??s4is
??t5ise
??tl5i
??5u
??va5g
??5val
??v3ar
??v4ara
??3ve
??v3in
????2
????l3
????m5
????3un
????v5an
????v3ar
??1fa
??fl3??
??fn5
??fr3u
??f3u
??4g
??g3gj
??ggv3
??g1re
??g2us
??k5e
??k5r??
??k3st
??k3ul
??kv3a
??4l
??l1f4
??lk2
??lu5mi
??l5un
??l2v
??lv5an
??m4b
??m3u
??nd4l
??ng5sv
??ng4us
??ng4v
??ngv3a
??nk3
??nn4l
??n3ug
??n5un
??r1e
??r4ge
??r4lan
??rm5un
??r3??
??r3ug
??r1un
??r3und
??rus4
??r2v
4??rva
??rv5al
??rv5an
??rv5ar
??rv4i
??r1y
??r5??
??4s
??sk3ul
??s3u
??t4s
??3tug
??t2v
??tv3a
??5u
??6??
